Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
PART 1 Inspection Warrants

Cross references.

Searches and seizures generally, T. 17, C. 5.

Further provisions regarding use of inspection warrants in enforcement of public health laws, § 31-5-20 et seq.

37-1-70.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Inspection warrant” means a warrant authorizing a search or inspection of private property where such a search or inspection is one that is necessary for the enforcement of a “mental health law.”

“Mental health law” means Code Sections 37-3-7, 37-3-8, and 37-4-7, Chapter 6 of this title, and any rule or regulation duly promulgated thereunder.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-301a, enacted by Ga. L. 1975, p. 693, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 13; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2010, p. 286, § 5/SB 244.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1994, p. 437, § 12, effective July 1, 1994, not codified by the General Assembly, amends Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19.1 to except the 1993 amendment of this Code section from repeal on June 30, 1999.

37-1-71.
Persons who may obtain inspection warrants; authorization of searches and inspections of property.

The commissioner or the commissioner’s delegate, in addition to other procedures now or hereafter provided, may obtain an inspection warrant under the conditions specified in this chapter. Such warrant shall authorize the commissioner or the commissioner’s
delegate to conduct a search or inspection of property either with or without the consent of the person whose property is to be searched or inspected if such search or inspection is one that is elsewhere authorized under the rules
and regulations duly promulgated under this title.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-302a, enacted by Ga. L. 1975, p. 693, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 14; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1994, p. 437, § 12, effective July 1, 1994, not codified by the General Assembly, amends Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19.1 to except the 1993 amendment of this Code section from repeal on June 30, 1999.

37-1-72.
Issuance; grounds.

Inspection warrants shall be issued only by a judge of a court of record whose territorial jurisdiction encompasses the property to be inspected.

The issuing judge shall issue the warrant when the judge is satisfied that the following conditions are met:

The one seeking the warrant must establish under oath or affirmation that the property to be inspected is to be inspected as a part of a legally authorized program of inspection which includes that property or that there is probable cause for believing
that there is a condition, object, activity, or circumstance which legally justifies such an inspection of that property; and

The issuing judge determines that the issuance of the warrant is authorized by this part.

History.
Code 1933, §§ 88-303a, 88-304a, enacted by Ga. L. 1975, p. 693, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228.

37-1-73.
Contents.

The inspection warrant shall be validly issued only if it meets the following requirements:

The warrant is attached to the affidavit required to be made in order to obtain the warrant;

The warrant describes either directly or by reference to the affidavit the property upon which the inspection is to occur and is sufficiently accurate that the executor of the warrant and the owner or possessor of the property can reasonably determine
from it the property of which the warrant authorizes an inspection;

The warrant indicates the conditions, objects, activities, or circumstances which the inspection is intended to check or reveal; and

The warrant refers in general terms to the statutory or regulatory provisions sought to be enforced.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-305a, enacted by Ga. L. 1975, p. 693, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228.

37-1-74.
Exclusion of evidence obtained.

No facts discovered or evidence obtained in an inspection conducted under authority of an inspection warrant issued pursuant to this part shall be competent as evidence in any criminal proceeding against any party.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-306a, enacted by Ga. L. 1975, p. 693, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228.